Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 2 Apportionment of House of Representatives and Senate; Qualifications of Members

Law reviews.

For article, “Walking the Line:
Modern Gerrymandering and Partisanship,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 1011 (2018).

For article, “The First Amendment Case Against Partisan Gerrymandering,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 1042 (2018).

For article, “The History of Redistricting in Georgia,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 1060 (2018).

For article, “Constitutional Preservation and the Judicial Review of Partisan Gerrymanders,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 1108 (2018).

For article, “Partisan Gerrymandering and the Constitutionalization of Statistics,” see 68 Emory L.J. 979 (2019).

For article, “

Rucho

for Minimalists,” see
71 Mercer L. Rev. 695 (2020).

28-2-1.
Apportionment and qualifications for the House of Representatives.

There shall be 180 members of the House of Representatives.

The General Assembly by general law shall divide the state into 180 representative districts which shall consist of either a portion of a county or a county or counties or any combination thereof and shall be represented by one Representative elected only by the electors of such district.

A member of the House of Representatives shall be a resident of the district which such member represents and at the time of such member’s election shall have been a resident of the territory embraced within such district for at least one year preceding such time.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-2-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 3/HB 1EX.

Cross references.

Constitutional requirements as to apportionment, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. II.

Constitutional requirements as to qualifications, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. III.

Disqualifications, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. IV.

Vacancies, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. V.

Designation of congressional districts of state, §

21-2-4

.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to apportionment and qualifications for the House of Representatives. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 192, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 291; Ga. L. 1901, p. 51, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 333; Ga. L. 1921, p. 229, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 48, § 1; Code 1933, § 47-101; Ga. L. 1941, p. 348, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 111, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 187, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 22, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 250, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 16, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1043, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 12, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 452, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1123, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1071, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1472, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 466, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, Ex. Sess., p. 186, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 492, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 827, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 813, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 174, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 795, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, Ex. Sess., p. 72, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 229, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 11, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 425, §§ 1-3 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 3/HB 1EX, effective August 24, 2011.

The 2001 House reapportionment plan provided by
O.C.G.A. §

28-2-1

, as amended by Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess. p. 425, §§ 1-3, was held unconstitutional in
Larios v. Cox, 300 F. Supp. 2d 1320 (N.D. Ga. 2004); aff’d,
542 U.S. 947 (2004).
For adoption of 2004 court-ordered remedial plan for House reapportionment, see
Larios v. Cox, 314 F. Supp. 2d 1357 (N.D. Ga. 2004).

Ga. L. 2006, p. 12, § 1/HB 1137, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly recognizes that the apportionment of the house districts for the 2004 elections was governed by the interim reapportionment plan entered by order of the United States District Court for the Northern District of Georgia in the case of
Larios v. Cox, 314 F. Supp. 2d 1357 (N.D. Ga. 2004).

“(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the districts for House Districts 1 through 180 shall continue to be those districts as provided in the order of the United States District Court in the case of Larios v. Cox. On and after January 1, 2007, House Districts 5, 12, 46, 48, 50, 51, 167, and 179 shall be as described in a report which is attached to this Act and is made a part of this Act.

“(c) The first members of the House of Representatives from House Districts 5, 12, 46, 48, 50, 51, 167, and 179 elected pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be those who are elected to take office on the convening date of the regular session of the General Assembly in 2007. Until that time the members of the House of Representatives elected from House Districts 5, 12, 46, 48, 50, 51, 167, and 179 under the interim court order in the case of Larios v. Cox shall continue to serve and shall represent the districts from which elected; and until that time the composition of the districts from which such members were elected shall remain the same. The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be effective, however, for the primary and general elections of 2006 for the purpose of electing members of the House of Representatives from House Districts 5, 12, 46, 48, 50, 51, 167, and 179 in 2006 who are to take office in 2007. Successors to those members shall likewise be elected under the provisions of this Act.”

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. HB 1EX, § 1/HB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia House of Representatives Redistricting Act of 2021.’”

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. HB 1EX, § 2/HB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, contains the description of the state house districts and related definitions, effectiveness, and applicability provisions.

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. HB 1EX, § 3/HB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The redistricting of the House of Representatives and the description of House Districts 1 through 180 provided for pursuant to this Act shall supersede and replace the redistricting of the House of Representatives and the description of House Districts 1 through 180 provided in an Act approved August 24, 2011 (Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 3), as amended, particularly by an Act approved February 23, 2012 (Ga. L. 2012, p. 21), and by an Act approved May 12, 2015 (Ga. L. 2015, p. 1413).”

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. HB 1EX, § 5/HB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for the repeal of Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 3, and all amendatory acts thereto, including but not limited to Ga. L. 2012, p. 21, and Ga. L. 2015, p. 1413, effective December 30, 2021.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Pinpoint Redistricting and the Minimization of Partisan Gerrymandering,” see 59 Emory L.J. 211 (2009).

For note, “Partisan Gerrymandering and Georgia:
Red, White, and Blue or Just Red and Blue?,” see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 487 (2019).

28-2-2.
Apportionment and qualifications for the Senate.

There shall be 56 members of the Senate. The General Assembly shall by general law divide the state into 56 Senate districts which shall be composed of a portion of a county or a county or counties or a combination thereof and shall be represented by one Senator elected only by the electors of such district.

A member of the Senate shall be a resident of the district which such member represents and at the time of such member’s election shall have been a resident of the territory embraced within such district for at least one year preceding such time.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-2-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 139, § 3/SB 1EX.

Cross references.

Constitutional requirements as to apportionment, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. II.

Constitutional requirements as to qualifications, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. III.

Disqualifications, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. II, Para. IV.

Vacancies, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. V.

Designation of congressional districts of state, §

21-2-4

.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to apportionment and qualifications for the Senate.
The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1906, p. 80, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 334; Ga. L. 1918, p. 84, §§ 1-4; Code 1933, § 47-102; Ga. L. 1945, p. 1042, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1946, p. 42, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, Ex. Sess., p. 7, § 9; Ga. L. 1964, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 691, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 245, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 561, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 159, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 36, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 560, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 557, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 69, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1233, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 444, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 394, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1465, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, Ex. Sess., p. 124, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 59, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 863, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 174, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, Ex. Sess., p. 6, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 163, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 42, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1676, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 2, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 23, § 1/SB 386 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 139, § 3/SB 1EX, effective August 24, 2011.

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. SB 1EX, § 1/SB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Senate Redistricting Act of 2021.’”

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. SB 1EX, § 2/SB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, contains the description of the state senate districts and related definitions, effectiveness, and applicability provisions.

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. SB 1EX, § 3/SB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“The redistricting of the Senate and the description of Senate Districts 1 through 56 provided for pursuant to this Act shall supersede and replace the redistricting of the Senate and the description of Senate Districts 1 through 56 provided in an Act approved August 24, 2011 (Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 139), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 13, 2012 (Ga. L. 2012, p. 62).”

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. SB 1EX, § 5/SB 1EX, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for the repeal of Ga. L. 2011, Ex. Sess., p. 139, and all amendatory acts thereto, including but not limited to Ga. L. 2012, p. 62, effective December 30, 2021.

Law reviews.

For note, “Perdue v. Baker: Who Has the Ultimate Power over Litigation on Behalf of the State of Georgia — the Governor or the Attorney General?,” see
21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 751 (2005).

For comment, “Pinpoint Redistricting and the Minimization of Partisan Gerrymandering,” see 59 Emory L.J. 211 (2009).

For note, “Partisan Gerrymandering and Georgia:
Red, White, and Blue or Just Red and Blue?,” see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 487 (2019).